Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB608.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 75 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "premises" has the same meaning as in KRS 138.208.
(2) (a) The board of trustees of a fire protection district or subdistrict, or a
volunteer fire department district, may assess a fee against a premises
within its jurisdiction to cover the actual costs of services and materials
required to maintain necessary fire protection measures for that premises.
(b) In setting the amount of the fee authorized by paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the board of trustees shall determine expenses related to fire
protection measures for the premises, including but not limited to:
1. Fire prevention inspections;
2. Firefighting equipment purchases and maintenance;
3. The actual resources used for fire protection services;
4. The market value of materials used; and
5. Any other measures deemed essential in providing fire protection to
the premises.
(3) The board of trustees may:
(a) Directly bill the owner of the premises for the fee authorized by subsection
(2) of this section. In addition, the board of trustees may set a monetary
penalty for nonpayment or late payment of the fee, and may issue a lien on
the property against which the fee was levied; or
(b) 1. Request the fiscal court of the county in which the fire protection
district or subdistrict, or volunteer fire department district, has
territory containing the premises to adopt an ordinance to add the fee
to the property tax bill sent to the owner of the premises.
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
2. In any county where the fiscal court has adopted an ordinance under
this paragraph, the county clerk shall add the fee to the tax bills of the
owner of the premises in a place separate from the taxes and other
fees on the bill so that the taxpayer can ascertain the amount of the
fee apart from the taxes and other fees on the bill.
3. Fees added to property tax bills under this paragraph shall be
collected and distributed by the sheriff to the applicable board of
trustees in the same manner as other taxes on the bill. Unpaid fees
shall bear the same penalty as general state and county property taxes,
and this shall be a lien on the property against which is levied from
the time of the levy. The fiscal court shall, in the ordinance, and in
consultation with the sheriff and the applicable board of trustees, set a
collection fee for the sheriff to retain in an amount not to exceed four
and one-fourth percent (4.25%) of the fee collected.
(4) (a) If the board of trustees directly bills the owner of the premises for the fee
authorized by subsection (2) of this section, the board shall issue a detailed
invoice specifying the incurred costs to the owner of the respective premises.
The invoice shall notify the owner of the premises of the appeals process set
out in subsection (5) of this section and include contact information for the
Kentucky Fire Commission to initiate an appeal.
(b) If the county fiscal court has adopted an ordinance placing the fee
authorized by subsection (2) of this section on the county tax bill, then the
board of trustees shall issue a document detailing the incurred costs to the
owner of the respective premises that also explains that the fee will be added
to the tax bill. The document shall be issued no later than September 1 of
each year. The document shall notify the owner of the premises of the
appeals process set out in subsection (5) of this section and include contact
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
information for the Kentucky Fire Commission to initiate an appeal.
(5) (a) The owner of a premises who believes the fee assessed against the premises
pursuant to this section is unjust or inaccurately assessed may appeal the
fee and have the issue brought before the Kentucky Fire Commission for
arbitration. The appeal shall be entered within sixty (60) days of the
issuance of the invoice under subsection (4)(a) of this section, or within
sixty (60) days of the issuance of the document set out in subsection (4)(b)
of this section.
(b) The board of trustees shall immediately reimburse the owners of the
premises of any fee paid and adjusted in favor of the owner of the premises.
Any penalties levied for nonpayment of the fee billed by the board or added
to a tax bill shall be adjusted to reflect the judgment of the Kentucky Fire
Commission after arbitration.
(c) The Kentucky Fire Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to provide for the arbitration process
set out in this section.
(6) No later than December 31 of each year, the board of trustees collecting a fee
under this section shall transmit a report to the Kentucky Fire Commission
containing:
(a) Every invoice or document sent to the owners of each premises as set out in
subsection (4) of this section, including any adjustments made as a result of
an appeal set out in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) An incident report listing when the fire protection district or subdistrict, or
volunteer fire department district responded to a premises during that year
or provided any inspections or other services directly to that premises; and
(c) A discussion of any difficulties faced by the board of trustees in
implementing this section.
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 75A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "premises" has the same meaning as in KRS 138.208.
(2) (a) The board of a district may assess a fee against a premises within its
jurisdiction to cover the actual costs of services and materials required to
maintain necessary fire protection measures for that premises.
(b) In setting the amount of the fee authorized by paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the board shall determine expenses related to fire protection
measures for the premises, including but not limited to:
1. Fire prevention inspections;
2. Firefighting equipment purchases and maintenance;
3. The actual resources used for fire protection services;
4. The market value of materials used; and
5. Any other measures deemed essential in providing fire protection to
the premises.
(3) The board may:
(a) Directly bill the owner of the premises for the fee authorized by subsection
(2) of this section. In addition, the board may set a monetary penalty for
nonpayment or late payment of the fee, and may issue a lien on the property
against which the fee was levied; or
(b) 1. Request the fiscal court of the county in which the district has territory
containing the premises to adopt an ordinance to add the fee to the
property tax bill sent to the owner of the premises.
2. In any county where the fiscal court has adopted an ordinance under
this paragraph, the county clerk shall add the fee to the tax bills of the
owner of the premises in a place separate from the taxes and other
fees on the bill so that the taxpayer can ascertain the amount of the
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
fee apart from the taxes and other fees on the bill.
3. Fees added to property tax bills under this paragraph shall be
collected and distributed by the sheriff to the applicable board in the
same manner as other taxes on the bill. Unpaid fees shall bear the
same penalty as general state and county property taxes, and this shall
be a lien on the property against which is levied from the time of the
levy. The fiscal court shall, in the ordinance, and in consultation with
the sheriff and the applicable board, set a collection fee for the sheriff
to retain in an amount not to exceed four and one-fourth percent
(4.25%) of the fee collected.
(4) (a) If the board directly bills the owner of the premises for the fee authorized by
subsection (2) of this section, the board shall issue a detailed invoice
specifying the incurred costs to the owner of the respective premises. The
invoice shall notify the owner of the premises of the appeals process set out
in subsection (5) of this section and include contact information for the
Kentucky Fire Commission to initiate an appeal.
(b) If the county fiscal court has adopted an ordinance placing the fee
authorized by subsection (2) of this section on the county tax bill, then the
board shall issue a document detailing the incurred costs to the owner of the
respective premises that also explains that the fee will be added to the tax
bill. The document shall be issued no later than September 1 of each year.
The document shall notify the owner of the premises of the appeals process
set out in subsection (5) of this section and include contact information for
the Kentucky Fire Commission to initiate an appeal.
(5) (a) The owner of a premises who believes the fee assessed against the premises
pursuant to this section is unjust or inaccurately assessed may appeal the
fee and have the issue brought before the Kentucky Fire Commission for
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
arbitration. The appeal shall be entered within sixty (60) days of the
issuance of the invoice under subsection (4)(a) of this section, or within
sixty (60) days of the issuance of the document set out in subsection (4)(b)
of this section.
(b) The board shall immediately reimburse the owners of the premises of any
fee paid and adjusted in favor of the owner of the premises. Any penalties
levied for nonpayment of the fee billed by the board or added to a tax bill
shall be adjusted to reflect the judgment of the Kentucky Fire Commission
after arbitration.
(c) The Kentucky Fire Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to provide for the arbitration process
set out in this section.
(6) No later than December 31 of each year, the board collecting a fee under this
section shall transmit a report to the Kentucky Fire Commission containing:
(a) Every invoice or document sent to the owners of each premises as set out in
subsection (4) of this section, including any adjustments made as a result of
an appeal set out in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) An incident report listing when the district responded to a premises during
that year or provided any inspections or other services directly to that
premises; and
(c) A discussion of any difficulties faced by the board in implementing this
section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 244 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section and Section 5 of this Act:
(a) "Angel dust" means the fungus Baudoinia compniacensis, commonly
known as whiskey fungus;
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
(b) "Licensee" means the holder of a distiller's license or any other license
issued under KRS Chapters 241 to 244, that has ownership or control over a
premises containing one (1) or more rickhouses;
(c) "Premises" has the same meaning as in KRS 138.208; and
(d) "Rickhouse" means a structure used for the storage and aging of distilled
spirits barrels, if the aging of those distilled spirits is a known factor in the
development of angel dust.
(2) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to develop and implement a program to reimburse property
owners on an annual basis for cleaning expenses related to accumulated angel
dust if the affected property is located within a three (3) mile radius of a distillery
or a premises with a rickhouse.
(3) (a) The cleaning expenses for a property shall be determined based on cleaning
costs incurred by the property owner. A property owner seeking
reimbursement shall provide clear documentation of cleaning expenses
attributed to angel dust.
(b) Verification of cleaning expenses shall be conducted by an independent
entity mutually agreed upon by the licensee and affected property owners. If
the licensee and property owners fail to agree, the department shall
determine the appropriate cleaning expenses.
(4) (a) The annual reimbursement process shall commence within thirty (30) days
of a property owner submitting the required documentation for that year.
(b) A licensee that fails to fully and timely comply with the reimbursement
requirements outlined in this section for a property shall be subject to a fine
equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the verified cleaning costs for that
property, in addition to the reimbursement due, and shall also be subject to
any other penalties authorized under KRS Chapters 241 to 244. The
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
department shall undertake necessary collections actions to enforce
reimbursement and fines.
(c) Fines under this subsection shall be imposed and collected by the
department, which shall deposit these moneys into the distilled spirits
environmental fund established in Section 5 of this Act.
(5) Reimbursement funds for each qualifying property owner shall be paid from the
distilled spirits environmental fund established in Section 5 of this Act.
(6) The department shall regulate and enforce this section and Section 5 of this Act,
and shall ensure fair and equitable reimbursement practices.
(7) (a) Any party aggrieved by a decision of the department related to this section
and Section 5 of this Act may request a hearing in accordance with KRS
Chapters 241 to 244 and KRS Chapter 13B.
(b) Any final order of the department related to this section and Section 5 of
this Act may be appealed to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 138 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(b) "Licensee" has the same meaning as in Section 3 of this Act; and
(c) "Premises" has the same meaning as in KRS 138.208.
(2) (a) Each licensee shall annually pay to the department an environmental fee of
twenty-five cents ($0.25) for each barrel of distilled spirits stored in a
premises on January 1.
(b) The fee shall be paid:
1. Into the State Treasury and transferred to the distilled spirits
environmental fund established in Section 5 of this Act;
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
2. On the twentieth day of October of each year; and
3. Either by use of a form prescribed by the department or an electronic
fund transfer.
(c) The number of barrels of distilled spirits shall be the same number reported
for property tax purposes under KRS 132.160.
(3) All provisions of KRS Chapter 131 shall apply to the environmental fee, including
but not limited to provisions regarding:
(a) Extensions of time for filing reports and returns;
(b) Uniform civil penalties imposed under KRS 131.180;
(c) The tax interest rate;
(d) The period for which records are to be preserved; and
(e) Procedures for protest of an assessment by the department.
(4) The environmental fee shall be deposited into the distilled spirits environmental
fund established in Section 5 of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 244 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the distilled spirits environmental fund. The fund shall consist of
moneys received from the environmental fee imposed by Section 4 of this Act,
fines imposed under Section 3 of this Act, state appropriations, gifts, grants, and
federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used to reimburse qualifying property
owners for cleaning costs incurred to remove angel dust caused by aging distilled
spirits and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1137
Section 6. Sections 3, 4, and 5 of this Act take effect January 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed